Idaho, session 2026, S1397.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 1, Title 61, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 61-126, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
61-126. WASTEWATER SYSTEM. The term "wastewater system" when used in
this chapter means any facility or system designed or used primarily for the
collection, conveyance, storage, treatment, reuse, or disposal of waste-
water or sewage, including pipelines, pump stations, treatment works, la-
goons, and related components, that are owned, operated, or managed to pro-
vide wastewater services.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 1, Title 61, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 61-127, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
61-127. WASTEWATER SERVICE CONNECTION. The term "wastewater service
connection" when used in this chapter means each individual physical point
of discharge where a customer's private sewage piping connects, or will con-
nect, to a wastewater system, typically at the wastewater system's collec-
tion main.
SECTION 3. That Chapter 1, Title 61, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 61-128, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
61-128. WASTEWATER CORPORATION. (1) The term "wastewater corpora-
tion" when used in this chapter includes every person and corporation, as
those terms are defined in this chapter, including their lessees and desig-
nated agents, owning, controlling, operating, or managing any wastewater
system for compensation within the state.
(2) A wastewater corporation serving a wastewater system with fewer
than one hundred (100) wastewater service connections that are actively
flowing or in which the customer pays a fee for standby, ready-to-serve, or


capacity reservation purposes shall not be considered a wastewater corpora-
tion and shall be exempt from regulation as a public utility.
(3) The public utilities commission may assess reasonable fees to a
wastewater corporation that is subject to its regulation. The fee shall not
exceed the reasonable costs incurred by the commission for the oversight and
regulation of the wastewater corporation.
SECTION 4. That Section 61-129, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
61-129. PUBLIC UTILITY. The term "public utility" when used in this
act includes every common carrier, pipeline corporation, gas corporation,
electrical corporation, telephone corporation and, water corporation, and
wastewater corporation that has been classified as a public utility pursuant
to this chapter, as those terms are defined in this chapter and each thereof
is hereby declared to be a public utility and to be subject to the jurisdic-
tion, control and regulation of the commission and to the provisions of this
act. The term "public utility" as used in this act shall cover cases:
(1) Where the service is performed and the commodity delivered directly
to the public or some portion thereof, and where the service is performed or
the commodity delivered to any corporation or corporations, or any person or
persons, who in turn, either directly or indirectly or mediately or immedi-
ately, performs the services or delivers such commodity to or for the public
or some portion thereof; and
(2) Where a pipeline corporation delivers the commodity to any corpo-
ration, person, their lessees, receivers or trustees regardless of whether
it offers the pipeline service or commodity to the public or some portion
thereof. Such pipeline shall be subject to the safety supervision and reg-
ulation of the commission only, unless and until such pipeline corporation
makes application to the commission to be regulated generally as a public
utility.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.